Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2e, is amended to read: Subd. 2e. Local optional revenue. (a) Local optional revenue for a school district equals the sum of the district's firstnew text begin , second, and thirdnew text end tiernew text begin ofnew text end local optional revenue deleted text begin and second tier local optional revenuedeleted text end . A district's first tier new text begin of new text end local optional revenue equals $300 times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. A district's second tiernew text begin ofnew text end local optional revenue equals $424 times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year.new text begin A district's third tier of local optional revenue equals the greater of zero or the product of the district's adjusted pupil units for that year times the difference between $100 and the district's operating referendum revenue per adjusted pupil unit for that year.new text end (b) A district's local optional levy equals the sum of deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin itsnew text end firstnew text begin , second, and thirdnew text end tier new text begin of new text end local optional levy deleted text begin and the second tier local optional levydeleted text end . (c) A district's first tier new text begin of new text end local optional levy equals the district's first tier new text begin of new text end local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $880,000. (d) deleted text begin For fiscal year 2023, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $548,842. For fiscal year 2024, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $510,000.deleted text end For fiscal year 2025, a district's second tiernew text begin ofnew text end local optional levy equals the district's second tier new text begin of new text end local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $626,450. For fiscal year 2026, a district's second tiernew text begin ofnew text end local optional levy equals the district's second tier new text begin of new text end local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $642,038. For fiscal year 2027 and later, a district's second tier new text begin of new text end local optional levy equals the district's second tier new text begin of new text end local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $671,345. new text begin (e) A district's third tier of local optional levy equals the district's third tier of local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $880,000. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The local optional levy must be spread on referendum market value. A district may levy less than the permitted amount. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A district's local optional aid equals its local optional revenue minus its local optional levy. If a district's actual levy for first deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end secondnew text begin , or thirdnew text end tiernew text begin ofnew text end local optional revenue is less than its maximum levy limit for that tier, its aid must be proportionately reduced. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Additional general education aid. new text end new text begin For additional general education aid required for increasing local optional revenue under section 1: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end